02_Morphology/chv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Имя существительное, Noun
%<pl%>               ! Множественное число, Plural
%<nom%>              ! Nominative
%<ins%>              ! Instrumental
%{A%}                ! Archiphoneme [a] or [e]
%{м%}                ! Archiphoneme [м] or 0
%{Ă%}                ! Archiphoneme [ӑ] or [ӗ] or 0
%>                   ! Граница морфемы, Morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

Nouns ; 

LEXICON CASES

%<ins%>:%>п%{A%} # ;

LEXICON PLURAL

             CASES ; 
%<pl%>:%>сем CASES ;

LEXICON N 

%<n%>: PLURAL ;

LEXICON Nouns

урам:урам N ;     ! "улица", "street"
пахча:пахча N ;   ! "сад", "garden"
хула:хула N ;     ! "город", "city"
канаш:канаш N ;   ! "совет", "council"
